North Carolina, session 2025, HB203.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 66-371 reads as rewritten:
"§ 66-371. Home appliance service agreement companies.agreements.
(a) This section Article applies to all home appliance service agreement companies
soliciting business agreements in use in this State, but it State. For the purposes of this section, a
"home service agreement" is a service agreement for a set list of appliances and systems in a
residence, regardless of whether the agreement is titled as a contract, home warranty, extended
home warranty, home appliance warranty, or other.
(a1) In addition to the requirements of G.S. 66-369.2, home service agreements shall
contain the following:
(1) A list of covered items that is referenced each time the agreement is discussing
coverage.
(2) A detailed description of the types of loss or damage the agreement covers.
(3) A detailed description of what is excluded from the agreement, in a prominent
location in the agreement and in bold face type.
(4) A statement of the purchaser's rights under G.S. 66-369.2(d)(2), in immediate
proximity to the space reserved for the signature of the purchaser of the
agreement, in bold face type of a minimum size of 10 points, in substantially
the following form:
"You, the purchaser of this service agreement, may cancel this contract at
anytime after purchase and receive a pro rata refund less any claims paid on
the agreement and a reasonable administrative fee, not to exceed ten percent
(10%) of the amount of the pro rata refund."
(a2) Home service agreement companies shall do all of the following:
(1) At the time of signing the agreement, provide either an electronic or paper
copy of the agreement to the purchasing consumer. The company shall also
have versions of the agreement available in formats that are accessible to
people with disabilities.
(2) Maintain a list of company-approved vendors available to perform services
under the agreement and allow customers the option to use an approved
*H203-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
vendor. The vendor list shall be updated regularly to remove vendors that are
unresponsive or have declined to work with the company on a routine basis.
(3) Ensure that the repair, replacement, or maintenance requested under the
agreement is completed or scheduled for completion within five business days
of a consumer's claim for any covered item that is necessary for heating,
air-conditioning, or the functioning of a bathroom if there is only one
bathroom in the residence. If the company cannot have the claim completed
or scheduled for completion within five days, the company shall pay to have
an out-of-network vendor complete the service.
(a3) This Article does not apply to any of the following:
(1) performance Performance guarantees or warranties made by manufacturers in
connection with the sale of new home appliances.
(2) This section does not apply to any Any home appliance dealer licensed to do
business in this State (i) whose primary business is the retail sale and service
of home appliances; (ii) who that makes and administers its own service
agreements without association with any other entity; and (iii) whose service
agreements cover primarily appliances sold by the dealer to its retail
customers, provided that customers so long as the dealer complies with
G.S. 66-372 G.S. 66-369.2 and G.S. 66-373.G.S. 66-369.3.
(3) This section does not apply to any A warranty made by a builder or seller of
real property relating to home appliances that are sold along with real
property.
(4) This section does not apply to any An issuer of credit cards or charge cards
that markets home appliance service agreements as an ancillary part of its
business; provided, however, that such business so long as the issuer maintains
insurance in accordance with G.S. 66-373.G.S. 66-369.3.
(b) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) "Home appliance" means a clothes washing machine or dryer; kitchen
appliance; vacuum cleaner; sewing machine; home audio or video electronic
equipment; home electronic data processing equipment; home exercise and
fitness equipment; home health care equipment; power tools; heater or air
conditioner, other than a permanently installed unit using internal ductwork;
or other personal consumer goods.
(2) "Home appliance service agreement" means any contract or agreement
indemnifying the home appliance service agreement holder against loss
caused by damage or failure, arising out of a power surge or the ownership,
operation, use, or accidental damage from handling of a home appliance, of a
mechanical or other component part of the home appliance that is listed in the
agreement. The term does not include a contract or agreement that reimburses
the home appliance service agreement holder for damage occurring during
delivery or installation of a home appliance.
(3) "Home appliance service agreement company" means any person that issues
home appliance service agreements and that is not a licensed insurer.
…."
SECTION 2.(a) Subsection (b) of G.S. 66-372 is recodified as G.S. 66-369.1 (to be
entitled "Definitions") and reads as rewritten:
"§ 66-369.1. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this section and in G.S. 66-373:Article:
(1) Consumer. – The purchaser or beneficiary of a service agreement.
Page 2 House Bill 203-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Covered items. – The list of items in a service agreement that are subject to
the agreement, with each item identified in detail by brand, location, or other
feature of the consumer's specific item.
(1)(3) Service agreement. – Includes motor vehicle service agreements and home
appliance agreements.An agreement between a consumer and a service
agreement company in which a consumer agrees to pay a set fee or premium,
and may agree to pay a deductible, in exchange for a service provider
promising to repair, replace, or maintain a set list of covered items. This term
includes agreements where the service provider facilitates but does not
actually perform the repair, replacement, or maintenance of a covered item
and agreements where a service provider reimburses the consumer for
obtaining their own repair, replacement, or maintenance.
(2)(4) Service agreement company. – Includes motor vehicle service agreement
companies and home appliance service agreement companies.A person, other
than an insurer licensed to write liability insurance under Article 7 or 16 of
Chapter 58 of the General Statutes, that issues service agreements."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 66-372(e)(2) is recodified as G.S. 66-370(a2). Subsections (a),
(c), (d), the remainder of (e), (f), (h), (i), (j), and (l) of G.S. 66-372 are recodified as subsections
(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), (h), and (i), respectively, of G.S. 66-369.2 (to be entitled
"Miscellaneous requirements for service agreements") and read as rewritten:
"§ 66-369.2. Miscellaneous requirements for service agreements.
(a) The provisions of this section and G.S. 66-373 apply to companies specified in G.S.
66-370 and G.S. 66-371.apply to all service agreements subject to this Article.
(b) Before the sale of any service agreement, the service agreement company shall give
written notice to the customer clearly disclosing that the purchase of the agreement is not required
either to purchase or to obtain financing for the purchase of a motor vehicle or home appliance,
as the case may be.good.
(c) No service agreement may be A service agreement used in this State by any service
agreement company if the agreement:violates this Article if it does any of the following:
(1) In any respect violates, or does not comply with, the laws of this State;State.
(2) Contains, or incorporates by reference when incorporation is otherwise
permissible, any inconsistent, ambiguous, or misleading clauses or any
exceptions and conditions that deceptively affect the risk purported to be
assumed in the general coverage of the agreement;agreement.
(3) Has any title, heading, or other indication of its provisions that is misleading;
ormisleading.
(4) Is printed or otherwise reproduced in a manner that renders any material
provision of the agreement substantially illegible.
(5) Contains provisions that allow the company to cancel the agreement in its
discretion other than for nonpayment of premiums or for a direct violation of
the agreement by the consumer where the service agreement states that
violation of the agreement would subject the agreement to cancellation.
(d) All service agreements used in this State by a service agreement company shall:shall
satisfy both of the following requirements:
(1) Not contain provisions that allow the company to cancel the agreement in its
discretion other than for nonpayment of premiums or for a direct violation of
the agreement by the consumer where the service agreement states that
violation of the agreement would subject the agreement to cancellation;
(3)(1) Contain a cancellation provision allowing the consumer to cancel at any time
after purchase and receive a pro rata refund less any claims paid on the
House Bill 203-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
agreement and a reasonable administrative fee, not to exceed ten percent
(10%) of the amount of the pro rata refund.
(2) Contain a list of covered items.
…."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 66-373 is recodified as G.S. 66-369.3 and reads as rewritten:
"§ 66-369.3. Insurance policy requirements.
(a) Each company or person subject to this section Article shall maintain contractual
liability insurance or service agreement reimbursement insurance with an authorized insurer
authorized to write liability insurance under Article 7, 16, 21, or 22 of Chapter 58 of the General
Statutes for one hundred percent (100%) of claims exposure, including reported and incurred but
not reported claims and claims expenses, on business written in this State unless the company or
person complies with all of the following:
…
(e) Persons and companies subject to G.S. 58-1-15, 58-1-20, 66-370, 66-371, and 66-374
G.S. 58-1-20, and this Article are subject to and shall comply with this section."
SECTION 2.(d) G.S. 66-370, as amended by subsection (b) of this section, reads as
rewritten:
"§ 66-370. Motor vehicle service agreement companies.agreements.
(a) For purposes of this section, "motor vehicle" is as defined in G.S. 20-4.01(23) and
includes mopeds as defined in G.S. 20-4.01(27)j.
(a1) This section Article applies to all motor vehicle service agreement companies
soliciting business agreements in use in this State, State. A motor vehicle service agreement is
either of the following:
(1) Any contract or agreement (i) indemnifying a consumer against loss caused
by a motor vehicle failure that is listed in the agreement or (ii) providing for
the repair of a motor vehicle failure that is listed in the agreement. For
purposes of this subsection, "motor vehicle failure" is the failure of a
mechanical or other component part of the motor vehicle arising out of the
ownership, operation, or use of the vehicle.
(2) A contract or agreement to perform or to indemnify a consumer for
performance of any of the following services:
a. The repair or replacement of tires or wheels on a motor vehicle
damaged as a result of coming into contact with road hazards.
b. The removal of dents, dings, or creases on a motor vehicle that can be
repaired using the process of paintless dent removal without affecting
the existing paint or finish and without replacing vehicle body panels,
sanding, bonding, or painting.
c. The repair of chips or cracks in or the replacement of motor vehicle
windshields as a result of damage caused by road hazards.
d. The replacement of a motor vehicle key or key fob in the event that
the key or key fob becomes inoperable or is lost or stolen.
e. Other services that may be approved by the Commissioner of
Insurance, if not inconsistent with other provisions of this Article.
(a2) With respect to a motor vehicle service agreement as defined in G.S. 66-370, In
addition to the requirements of G.S. 66-369.2, motor vehicle service agreements shall provide
for a right of assignability by the consumer to a subsequent purchaser before expiration of
coverage if the subsequent purchaser meets the same criteria for motor vehicle service agreement
acceptability as the original purchaser; andpurchaser.
(a3) but it This Article does not apply to any of the following:
(1) maintenance Maintenance agreements, performance guarantees, warranties,
or motor vehicle service agreements made byby any of the following:
Page 4 House Bill 203-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1)a. A manufacturer,manufacturer.
(2)b. A distributor, ordistributor.
(3)c. A subsidiary or affiliate of a manufacturer or a distributor, where
fifty-one percent (51%) or more of the subsidiary or affiliate is owned
directly or indirectly byby any of the following:
a.1. The manufacturer,manufacturer.
b.2. The distributor, ordistributor.
c.3. The common owner of fifty-one percent (51%) or more of the
manufacturer or distributor in connection with the sale of
motor vehicles.
(2) This section does not apply to any A motor vehicle dealer licensed to do
business in this State (i) whose primary business is the retail sale and service
of motor vehicles; (ii) who that makes and administers its own service
agreements with or without association with a third-party administrator or
who that makes its own service agreements in association with a
manufacturer, distributor, or their subsidiaries or affiliates; and (iii) whose
service agreements cover only vehicles sold by the dealer to its retail
customer; provided that customer so long as the dealer complies with
G.S. 66-372 G.S. 66-369.2 and G.S. 66-373.G.S. 66-369.3.
(3) A motor vehicle dealer who sells a motor vehicle service agreement to a
consumer, as defined in 15 U.S.C. § 2301(3), is not deemed to have made a
written warranty to the consumer with respect to the motor vehicle sold or to
have entered into a service contract with the consumer that applies to the
motor vehicle, as provided in 15 U.S.C. § 2308(a), if: (i) the motor vehicle
dealer acts as a mere agent of a third party in selling the motor vehicle service
agreement; and (ii) the motor vehicle dealer would, after the sale of the motor
vehicle service agreement, have no further obligation under the motor vehicle
service agreement to the consumer to service or repair the vehicle sold to the
consumer at or within 90 days before the dealer sold the motor vehicle service
agreement to the consumer. An agreement whereby an employer, or a third
party contracted by the employer, provides mileage reimbursement and
incidental maintenance and repairs to its employees for personal vehicles used
for business purposes shall is not be considered a motor vehicle service
agreement or a contract of insurance.
(4) A contract or agreement guaranteeing the performance of parts or lubricants
manufactured or distributed by the guarantor and sold for use in connection
with a motor vehicle where no additional consideration is paid or given to the
guarantor for the contract or agreement beyond the price of the parts or
lubricants.
(a4) A motor vehicle dealer that sells a motor vehicle service agreement to a consumer, as
defined in 15 U.S.C. § 2301(3), is not deemed to have made a written warranty to the consumer
with respect to the motor vehicle sold or to have entered into a service contract with the consumer
that applies to the motor vehicle, as provided in 15 U.S.C. § 2308(a), if (i) the motor vehicle
dealer acts as a mere agent of a third party in selling the motor vehicle service agreement and (ii)
the motor vehicle dealer would, after the sale of the motor vehicle service agreement, have no
further obligation under the motor vehicle service agreement to the consumer to service or repair
the vehicle sold to the consumer at or within 90 days before the dealer sold the motor vehicle
service agreement to the consumer.
(b) The following definitions apply in this section and in G.S. 66-371, 66-372, and
66-373:
House Bill 203-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Ancillary anti-theft protection program. – A device or system that (i) is
installed on or applied to a motor vehicle, (ii) is designed to prevent loss or
damage to a motor vehicle from theft, and (iii) includes an ancillary anti-theft
protection program warranty. For purposes of this section, the term "ancillary
anti-theft protection program" includes alarm systems, body part marking
products, steering locks, window etch products, pedal and ignition locks, fuel
and ignition kill switches, and electronic, radio, and satellite tracking devices.
"Ancillary anti-theft protection program" does not include fuel additives, oil
additives, or other chemical products applied to the engine, transmission, or
fuel system or interior or exterior surfaces of a motor vehicle.
(1a) Ancillary anti-theft protection program warranty. – A written agreement by a
warrantor that provides if the ancillary anti-theft protection program fails to
prevent loss or damage to a motor vehicle from a theft, that the warrantor will
pay to or on behalf of the warranty holder specified incidental costs, as a result
of the failure of the ancillary anti-theft protection program to perform pursuant
to the terms of the ancillary anti-theft protection program warranty. Incidental
costs may be reimbursed in either a fixed amount specified in the ancillary
anti-theft protection program warranty or by use of a formula itemizing
specific incidental costs incurred by the warranty holder.
(1b) Authorized insurer. – An insurance company authorized to write liability
insurance under Articles 7, 16, 21, or 22 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes.
(2) Distributor. – Defined in G.S. 20-286(3).
(3) Licensed insurer. – An insurance company licensed to write liability insurance
under Article 7 or 16 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes.
(4) Motor vehicle. – Defined in G.S. 20-4.01(23), but also including mopeds as
defined in G.S. 20-4.01(27)j.
(4a) Motor vehicle failure. – The failure of a mechanical or other component part
of the motor vehicle arising out of the ownership, operation, or use of the
vehicle.
(5) Motor vehicle service agreement. –
a. Any contract or agreement (i) indemnifying the motor vehicle service
agreement holder against loss caused by a motor vehicle failure that is
listed in the agreement or (ii) providing for the repair of a motor
vehicle failure that is listed in the agreement.
b. A motor vehicle service agreement includes a contract or agreement to
perform or to indemnify the holder of the motor vehicle service
agreement for performance of any of the following services:
1. The repair or replacement of tires or wheels on a motor vehicle
damaged as a result of coming into contact with road hazards.
2. The removal of dents, dings, or creases on a motor vehicle that
can be repaired using the process of paintless dent removal
without affecting the existing paint or finish and without
replacing vehicle body panels, sanding, bonding, or painting.
3. The repair of chips or cracks in or the replacement of motor
vehicle windshields as a result of damage caused by road
hazards.
4. The replacement of a motor vehicle key or key fob in the event
that the key or key fob becomes inoperable or is lost or stolen.
5. Other services which may be approved by the Commissioner
of Insurance, if not inconsistent with other provisions of this
Article.
Page 6 House Bill 203-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. A motor vehicle service agreement does not include a contract or
agreement guaranteeing the performance of parts or lubricants
manufactured or distributed by the guarantor and sold for use in
connection with a motor vehicle where no additional consideration is
paid or given to the guarantor for the contract or agreement beyond the
price of the parts or lubricants.
(6) Motor vehicle service agreement company. – Any person that issues motor
vehicle service agreements and that is not a licensed insurer.
…."
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Justice the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year to be allocated to the Office of the Attorney General to enforce the provisions of Article 43
of Chapter 66 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act.
SECTION 4. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective October 1, 2025, and
apply to service agreements entered into on or after that date. Section 3 of this act becomes
effective July 1, 2025. The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
House Bill 203-First Edition Page 7